trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="alkali__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="makadam__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="reagens__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="st/av__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>av</l>        <r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aven</l>      <r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äver</l>      <r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äverna</l>    <r>av<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="x__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>x</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="situp__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sarna</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sotbr/and__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anden</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ann</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änder</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änderna</l>   <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kefir__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ri/a__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orna</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="r__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kad/er__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ern</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rer</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rerna</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tö__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="antimateri/a__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="reagens">         <i>reagens</i><par n="reagens__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="basset">          <i>basset</i><par n="situp__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="situpp">          <i>situpp</i><par n="situp__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="militärmanöver">  <i>militärmanöv</i><par n="kad/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sittupp">         <i>sittupp</i><par n="situp__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="situp">           <i>situp</i><par n="situp__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="x">               <i>x</i><par n="x__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sittup">          <i>sittup</i><par n="situp__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gimmick">         <i>gimmick</i><par n="situp__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kaliber">         <i>kalib</i><par n="kad/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="happening">       <i>happening</i><par n="situp__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="baluster">        <i>balust</i><par n="kad/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="undanmanöver">    <i>undanmanöv</i><par n="kad/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="laptopp">         <i>laptopp</i><par n="situp__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kniptångsmanöver"><i>kniptångsmanöv</i><par n="kad/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pellet">          <i>pellet</i><par n="situp__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="forward">         <i>forward</i><par n="situp__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kader">           <i>kad</i><par n="kad/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bobsleigh">       <i>bobsleigh</i><par n="situp__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="monter">          <i>mont</i><par n="kad/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="oldboy">          <i>oldboy</i><par n="situp__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="cocktail">        <i>cocktail</i><par n="situp__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="r">               <i>r</i><par n="r__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="lyster">          <i>lyst</i><par n="kad/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="manöver">         <i>manöv</i><par n="kad/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tryckbokstav">    <i>tryckbokst</i><par n="st/av__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stav">            <i>st</i><par n="st/av__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="söndagsbokstav">  <i>söndagsbokst</i><par n="st/av__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="årsbokstav">      <i>årsbokst</i><par n="st/av__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bokstav">         <i>bokst</i><par n="st/av__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="alkali">          <i>alkali</i><par n="alkali__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sotbrand">        <i>sotbr</i><par n="sotbr/and__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="begynnelsebokstav"><i>begynnelsebokst</i><par n="st/av__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="nationalitetsbokstav"><i>nationalitetsbokst</i><par n="st/av__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="länsbokstav">     <i>länsbokst</i><par n="st/av__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="översitteri">     <i>översitteri</i><par n="alkali__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="pingla">          <i>pingl</i><par n="ri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lärarinna">       <i>lärarinn</i><par n="ri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="smärta">          <i>smärt</i><par n="ri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="beundrarinna">    <i>beundrarinn</i><par n="ri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tolklina">        <i>tolklin</i><par n="ri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="spikklubba">      <i>spikklubb</i><par n="ri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="makadam">         <i>makadam</i><par n="makadam__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bittersöta">      <i>bittersöt</i><par n="ri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="koppar">          <i>koppar</i><par n="kefir__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kaviar">          <i>kaviar</i><par n="kefir__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="jordhåla">        <i>jordhål</i><par n="ri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dinkel">          <i>dinkel</i><par n="kefir__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="utvecklingshistoria"><i>utvecklingshistori</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="världshistoria">  <i>världshistori</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="naturhistoria">   <i>naturhistori</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="nia">             <i>ni</i><par n="ri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="idéhistoria">     <i>idéhistori</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="klotyta">         <i>klotyt</i><par n="ri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="förhistoria">     <i>förhistori</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lärdomshistoria"> <i>lärdomshistori</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kulturhistoria">  <i>kulturhistori</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bibliotekshögskola"><i>bibliotekshögskol</i><par n="ri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="personhistoria">  <i>personhistori</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="naturalhistoria"> <i>naturalhistori</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kefir">           <i>kefir</i><par n="kefir__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="huggsexa">        <i>huggsex</i><par n="ri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tö">              <i>tö</i><par n="tö__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="samtidshistoria"> <i>samtidshistori</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="antimateria">     <i>antimateri</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kyrkohistoria">   <i>kyrkohistori</i><par n="antimateri/a__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kommandobrygga">  <i>kommandobrygg</i><par n="ri/a__n_ut"/></e>
